North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122A. North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.
§ 122A-5.
General powers.

The Agency shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the provisions of this Chapter, including the power:

To participate in any federally assisted lease program for housing for persons of lower income under any federal legislation, including, without limitation, section 8 of the National Housing Act; provided, however, that such participation may take place only upon the request and approval of the governing body of the county, city or town in which any such project is to be located;

To make or participate in the making of mortgage loans to sponsors of residential housing; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the determination by the Agency that mortgage loans are not otherwise available wholly or in part from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions;

To purchase or participate in the purchase and enter into commitments by itself or together with others for

The purchase of mortgage loans made by mortgage lenders to sponsors of residential housing or to persons of lower income for residential housing where the Agency has given its approval prior to the initial making of the mortgage loan; provided, however, that any such purchase shall be made only upon the determination by the Agency that mortgage loans were, at the time the approval was given, not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions, or

The purchase of mortgage loans made by mortgage lenders without such prior approval to sponsors of housing for persons and families of any income or to persons of any income for housing upon such terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used by such mortgage lenders for the making of new mortgage loans to sponsors of residential housing or to persons of lower income for residential housing as the Agency may prescribe by its rules and regulations; provided, however, that (i) any such purchase of existing mortgage loans shall be made only upon the determination by the Agency that such new mortgage loans are not otherwise available from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions, and (ii) the Agency shall purchase mortgage loans made to sponsors of housing for persons and families not of lower income or to persons not of lower income for housing only upon the determination by the Agency that mortgage loans made to sponsors of residential housing or to persons of lower income for residential housing are not available for purchase by the Agency upon reasonable terms and conditions;

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1296, s. 24;

(4a)

To make loans to mortgage lenders on terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used by such mortgage lenders to originate new mortgage loans to (i) sponsors of residential housing for persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income and (ii) persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income for residential housing. The loans to mortgage lenders and the loans to be made by such mortgage lenders shall be made on such applicable terms and conditions as are set forth in rules and regulations of the Agency; Provided, however, that loans shall be made by such mortgage lenders only upon the determination by the Agency that such financing is not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions;

To collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing and servicing its loans, notes, bonds, commitments and other evidences of indebtedness;

To acquire on a temporary basis real property, or an interest therein, in its own name, by purchase, transfer or foreclosure, where such acquisition is necessary or appropriate to protect any loan in which the Agency has an interest and to sell, transfer and convey any such property to a buyer and, in the event such sale, transfer or conveyance cannot be effected with reasonable promptness or at a reasonable price, to rent or lease such property to a tenant pending such sale, transfer or conveyance;

To sell, at public or private sale, all or any part of any mortgage or other instrument or document securing a loan of any type permitted by this Chapter;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operations in such amounts, and from such insurers, as it may deem necessary or desirable;

To consent, whenever it deems it necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms, of any mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, contract or agreement of any kind to which the Agency is a party;

To borrow money as herein provided to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes and to issue its obligation as evidence of any such borrowing;

To include in any borrowing such amounts as may be deemed necessary by the Agency to pay financing charges, interest on the obligations for a period not exceeding two years from their date, consultant, advisory and legal fees and such other expenses as are necessary or incident to such borrowing;

To make and publish rules and regulations respecting its lending programs and such other rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate its corporate purposes;

To provide technical and advisory services to sponsors, builders and developers of residential housing and to residents thereof;

To promote research and development in scientific methods of constructing low-cost residential housing of high durability;

To service or contract for the servicing of mortgage loans and to make and execute agreements, contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the Agency under this Chapter, including contracts with any person, firm, corporation, governmental agency or other entity, and each and any North Carolina governmental agency is hereby authorized to enter into contracts and otherwise cooperate with the Agency to facilitate the purposes of this Chapter;

To receive, administer and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any appropriation or any gift, grant or donation of any property or money, including the proceeds of general obligation bonds of the State;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded;

To establish and maintain an office for the transaction of its business in the City of Raleigh and at such place or places as the board of directors deems advisable or necessary in carrying out the purposes of this Chapter;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and to prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

To employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the Agency and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the Agency therefor;

To purchase or to participate in the purchase and enter into commitments by itself or together with others for the purchase of federally insured securities; provided, however, that the Agency shall first determine that the proceeds of such securities will be utilized for the purpose of making new mortgage loans to sponsors of residential housing or to persons of lower income for residential housing, all as specified in regulations to be adopted by the Agency;

To provide, or contract for the providing of, management and counseling services whenever, in the judgment of the Agency, no other satisfactory low-income housing counseling service is available for occupants of rental projects for persons of lower income or for prospective homeowners of lower income; provided, however, that no such program shall be undertaken until the Agency shall have made a study of its feasibility and shall have determined that the undertaking of such program will not adversely affect other programs of the Agency;

To advise the Governor regarding the coordination of public and private low- and moderate-income housing programs;

To participate in and administer federal housing programs, including housing rehabilitation, construction of new housing, assistance to the homeless, and home ownership assistance;

To acquire, hold, rent, encumber, transfer, convey, and otherwise deal with real property and utilities in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only to the approval of the Governor and Council of State. The Board of Directors may pledge or encumber income and assets of the Agency to secure financing for real property; and

To select and retain, subject to the approval of the Local Government Commission, the financial consultants, underwriters, and bond attorneys to be associated with the issuance of any bonds and to pay for services rendered by underwriters, financial consultants, or bond attorneys out of the proceeds of any such issue with regard to which the services were performed.

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-31, s. 23.1(b).

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 5; 1973, c. 1296, ss. 21-24, 27, 29, 35, 36, 40-43; 1975, c. 616, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 895, s. 3; 1983, c. 148, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 305(b); 2008-194, s. 1(a); 2009-570, s. 15; 2010-31, s. 23.1(a), (b); 2011-288, s. 7.

§ 122A-5.1.
Rules and regulations governing Agency activity.

The Agency shall from time to time adopt, modify or repeal rules and regulations governing the purchase of federally insured securities by the Agency and the purchase and sale of mortgage loans and the application of the proceeds thereof, including rules and regulations as to any or all of the following:

Procedures for the submission of requests or the invitation of proposals for the purchase and sale of mortgage loans or for the purchase of federally insured securities;

Limitations or restrictions as to the number of family units, location or other qualifications or characteristics of residences to be financed by mortgage loans and requirements as to the income limits of persons and families of lower income occupying such residences;

Restrictions as to the interest rates on mortgage loans or the return which may be realized by mortgage lenders on any mortgage loans or on the sale of federally insured securities to the Agency;

Requirements as to commitments by mortgage lenders with respect to the use of the proceeds of sale of any federally insured securities;

Schedules of any fees and charges necessary to provide for expenses and reserves of the Agency; and

Any other matters related to the duties and the exercise of the powers of the Agency to purchase and sell mortgage loans, or to purchase federally insured securities.Such rules and regulations shall be designed to effectuate the general purposes of this Chapter and the following specific objectives: (i) the construction of decent, safe and sanitary residential housing at low prices or rentals which persons and families of lower income can afford; (ii) the rehabilitation of present lower-income housing; (iii) increasing the supply of residential housing for persons and families of lower income affected by the spread of slum conditions and blight and for persons and families of lower income displaced by public action or natural disaster; (iv) the encouraging of private enterprise and investment to sponsor, build and rehabilitate residential housing for such persons and families to prevent the recurrence of slum conditions and blight and assist in their permanent elimination throughout the State; and (v) the restriction of the financial return and benefit to that necessary to protect against the realization by mortgage lenders of an excessive financial return or benefit as determined by prevailing market conditions.

The interest rate or rates and other terms of federally insured securities or mortgage loans purchased from the proceeds of any issue of bonds of the Agency shall be at least sufficient to assure the payment of said bonds and the interest thereon as the same become due from the amounts received by the Agency in repayment of such federally insured securities or such loans and interest thereon.

The Agency shall require as a condition of the purchase of federally insured securities from a mortgage lender and the purchase or the making of a commitment to purchase mortgage loans from a mortgage lender where the Agency has not given its approval prior to the initial making of the mortgage loan that such mortgage lender shall on or prior to the one-hundred-eightieth day (or such earlier day as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the Agency) following the receipt of the sale proceeds have entered into written commitments to make, and shall thereafter proceed as promptly as practicable to make from such sale proceeds, new mortgage loans with respect to residential housing in the State having a stated maturity of not less than 20 years from the date thereof in an aggregate principal amount equal to the amount of such sale proceeds. The Agency shall not purchase nor make commitment to purchase mortgage loans, federally insured securities or other obligations from a mortgage lender from which it has previously purchased federally insured securities or mortgage loans initially made without such prior approval unless said mortgage lender has either made or entered into written commitments to make such new mortgage loans.

History.

1973, c. 1296, s. 44; 1975, c. 616, s. 3.

§ 122A-5.2.
Mortgage insurance authority.

The Agency may upon application of a proposed mortgagee insure and make advance commitments to insure payments required by a loan for residential housing for persons of lower income upon such terms and conditions as the Agency may prescribe. Mortgage loans insured by the Agency under this Chapter may provide financing for related ancillary facilities to the extent permitted by applicable Agency regulations. Mortgage loans insured by the Agency under this Chapter shall be secured by a first mortgage.The aggregate principal amount of all mortgages so insured by the Agency under this Chapter and outstanding at any one time shall not exceed 10 times the average annual balance for the preceding calendar year of funds on deposit in the housing mortgage insurance fund, the creation of which is hereby authorized. The aggregate amount of principal obligations of all mortgages so insured shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from moneys on deposit to the credit of the housing mortgage insurance fund. Any contract of insurance executed by the Agency under this section shall be conclusive evidence of eligibility for such mortgage insurance and the validity of any contract of insurance so executed or of an advance commitment to issue such shall be incontestable in the hands of a mortgagee from the date of execution of such contract or commitment, except for fraud or misrepresentation on the part of such mortgagee and, as to commitments to insure, noncompliance with the terms of the advance commitment or Agency regulations in force at the time of issuance of the advance commitment.

For mortgage payments to be eligible for insurance under the provisions of this Chapter, the underlying mortgage loan shall:

Be one which is made and held by a mortgagee approved by the Agency as responsible and able to service the mortgage properly;

Not exceed (i) ninety percent (90%) of the estimated cost of the proposed housing if owned or to be owned by a profit-making sponsor or (ii) one hundred percent (100%) of the estimated cost of such proposed housing if owned or to be owned by a nonprofit housing sponsor or, if owned by a person or family of lower income, in the case of a single family dwelling or condominium;

Have a maturity satisfactory to the Agency but in no case longer than eighty percent (80%) of the Corporation’s [Agency’s] estimate of the remaining useful life of said housing or 40 years from the date of the issuance of insurance, whichever is earlier;

Contain amortization provisions satisfactory to the Agency requiring periodic payments by the mortgagor not in excess of his ability to pay as determined by the Agency;

Be in such form and contain such terms and provisions with respect to maturity, property insurance, repairs, alterations, payment of taxes and assessments, default reserves, delinquency charges, default remedies, anticipation of maturity, additional and secondary liens, equitable and legal redemption rights, prepayment privileges and other matters as the Agency may prescribe.

All applications for mortgage insurance shall be forwarded, together with an application fee prescribed by the Agency, to the executive director of the Agency. The Agency shall cause an investigation of the proposed housing to be made, review the application and the report of the investigation, and approve or deny the application. No application shall be approved unless the Agency finds that it is consistent with the purposes of this Chapter and further finds that the financing plan for the proposed housing is sound. The Agency shall notify the applicant and the proposed lender of its decision. Any such approval shall be conditioned upon payment to the Agency, within such reasonable time and after notification of approval as may be specified by the Agency, of the commitment fee prescribed by the Agency.

The Agency shall fix mortgage insurance premiums for the insurance of mortgage payments under the provision of this Chapter. Such premiums shall be computed as a percentage of the principal of the mortgage outstanding at the beginning of each mortgage year, but shall not be more than one half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) per year of such principal amount. The amount of premium need not be uniform for all insured loans. Such premiums shall be payable by mortgagors or mortgagees in such manner as prescribed by the Agency.

In the event of default by the mortgagor, the mortgagee shall notify the Agency both of the default and the mortgagee’s proposed course of action. When it appears feasible, the Agency may for a temporary period upon default or threatened default by the mortgagor authorize mortgage payments to be made by the Agency to the mortgagee which payments shall be repaid under such conditions as the Agency may prescribe. The Agency may also agree to revised terms of financing when such appear prudent. The mortgagee shall be entitled to receive the benefits of the insurance provided herein upon:

Any sale of the mortgaged property by court order in foreclosure or a sale with the consent of the Agency by the mortgagor or a subsequent owner of the property or by the mortgagee after foreclosure or acquisition by deed in lieu of foreclosure, provided all claims of the mortgagee against the mortgagor or others arising from the mortgage, foreclosure, or any deficiency judgment shall be assigned to the Agency without recourse except such claims as may have been released with the consent of the Agency; or

The expiration of six months after the mortgagee has taken title to the mortgaged property under judgment of strict foreclosure, foreclosure by sale or other judicial sale, or under a deed in lieu of foreclosure if during such period the mortgagee has made a bona fide attempt to sell the property, and thereafter conveys the property to the Agency with an assignment, without recourse, to the Agency of all claims of the mortgagee against the mortgagor or others arising out of the mortgage foreclosure, or deficiency judgment; or

The acceptance by the Agency of title to the property or an assignment of the mortgage, without recourse to the Agency, in the event the Agency determines it imprudent to proceed under (1) or (2) above.Upon the occurrence of either (1), (2) or (3) hereof, the obligation of the mortgagee to pay premium charges for insurance shall cease, and the Agency shall, within 30 days thereafter, pay to the mortgagee ninety-eight percent (98%) of the sum of (i) the then unpaid principal balance of the insured indebtedness, (ii) the unpaid interest to the date of conveyance or assignment to the Agency, as the case may be, (iii) the amount of all payments made by the mortgagee for which it has not been reimbursed for taxes, insurance, assessments and mortgage insurance premiums, and (iv) such other necessary fees, costs or expenses of the mortgagee as may be approved by the Agency.

Upon request of the mortgagee, the Agency may at any time, under such terms and conditions as it may prescribe, consent to the release of the mortgagor from his liability or consent to the release of parts of the property from the lien of the mortgage, or approve a substitute mortgagor or sale of the property or part thereof.

No claim for the benefit of the insurance provided in this Chapter shall be accepted by the Agency except within one year after any sale or acquisition of title of the mortgaged premises described in subdivisions (1) or (2) of subsection (e) of this section.

There shall be paid into the housing mortgage insurance fund (i) all premiums received by the Agency for the granting of such mortgage insurance, (ii) any moneys or other assets received by the Agency as a result of default or delinquency on mortgage loans insured by the Agency, including any proceeds from the sale or lease of real property, (iii) any moneys appropriated and made available by the State for the purpose of such fund.

History.

1973, c. 1296, s. 45.

§ 122A-5.3.
Energy conservation loan authority.

The Agency may guarantee the payment or collection of energy conservation loans pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter when the Agency has given its approval prior to the initial making of the loan; provided that any such guarantee shall be made only upon determination by the Agency that energy conservation loans were at the time of approval not otherwise available from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions; and provided further, no single guarantee of payment or collection shall exceed the sum of twelve hundred dollars ($1200) and no person or family of lower income shall be entitled to more than one loan guarantee.

At no time may the Agency have outstanding loan guarantees in which the liability of the Agency exceeds 15 times any amounts remaining unspent from the specific funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the energy conservation loan guarantee program plus any specific grants or donations for this purpose; but the Agency is authorized to expend any unspent amounts from these sources to satisfy its liabilities under the loan guarantee program; provided no other assets of the Agency shall be obligated or expended in satisfaction of its energy conservation loan guarantee liability.

The Agency shall from time to time adopt, modify, or repeal rules and regulations governing the guaranteeing of energy conservation loans including rules and regulations as to any or all of the following:

Procedures for the submission and approval of requests to guarantee energy conservation loans including advance commitments by the Agency to guarantee loans;

Limitations and restrictions on the number of family units, location or other qualifications or characteristics of residences in regard to which energy conservation work is performed to qualify for a loan guarantee;

Restrictions as to interest rates on energy conservation loans or the return which may be realized by mortgage lenders on energy conservation loans guaranteed by the Agency;

Schedules of any fees and charges necessary to provide for the administrative expenses of the Agency allocable to the administration of the energy conservation loan guarantee program;

Procedures regarding the servicing of energy conservation loan guarantees including procedures for honoring defaults and procedures to be implemented to enforce the obligations of the borrowers to repay guaranteed energy conservation loans;

Any other matters related to the duties and the exercise of the power of the Agency with respect to the energy conservation loan guarantee program deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act.

History.

1977, c. 1083, s. 3.

§ 122A-5.4.
Housing for persons and families of moderate income.

The General Assembly hereby finds and determines that there is a serious shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing which persons and families of moderate income in the State can afford; that it is in the best interests of the State to encourage home ownership by persons and families of moderate income; that the assistance provided by this section will enable persons and families of moderate income to acquire existing decent, safe and sanitary housing without undue financial hardship and will encourage private enterprise to sponsor, build and rehabilitate additional housing for such persons and families; and that the Agency in providing such assistance is promoting the health, welfare and prosperity of all citizens of the State and is serving a public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

The terms “persons and families of lower income” and “persons of lower income” wherever they appear in this Chapter, except where they appear in

G.S. 122A-2

and

G.S. 122A-3

, shall be deemed to include “persons and families of moderate income” as defined in clause (c) of this section.

“Persons and families of moderate income” means persons and families deemed by the Agency to require the assistance made available by this Chapter on account of insufficient personal or family income taking into consideration, without limitation, (i) the amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs, (ii) the size of the family, (iii) the cost and condition of housing facilities available and (iv) the eligibility of such persons and families for federal housing assistance of any type predicated upon a moderate or low and moderate income basis.

History.

1979, c. 810; 2008-107, s. 21.1(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 21.1(b), effective July 1, 2008, substituted “G.S. 122A-3” for “G.S. 122A-3(11)” in subsection (b).

§ 122A-5.5.
Rehabilitation Loan Authority.

In order to effectuate the authority of the Agency to participate in commitments to purchase and to purchase mortgage loans for the rehabilitation of existing residential housing the Agency is hereby empowered to adopt, modify or repeal rules and regulations governing the making or participation in the making of mortgage loans and the purchase or participation in commitments for the purchase of mortgage loans for the rehabilitation of existing residential housing.

The rules and regulations of the Agency adopted pursuant to this section shall provide at a minimum that:

Rehabilitation mortgage loans shall be for the purpose of owner-financed improvements to or renovation of residential housing;

Requirements for eligibility for rehabilitation mortgage loans shall be consistent with all applicable federal laws and regulations governing bonds for rehabilitation mortgage loans in order to insure that such bonds are exempt from taxation.

History.

1981, c. 344, s. 2.

§ 122A-5.6.
Terms and conditions of loans to and by mortgage lenders.

The Agency shall from time to time adopt, modify, amend or repeal rules and regulations governing the making of loans to mortgage lenders and the application of the proceeds thereof. These rules and regulations shall be designed to effectuate the general purposes of this Chapter and the following specific objectives: (i) the construction and rehabilitation of decent, safe and sanitary residential housing available to persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income at prices or rentals that they can afford; (ii) the encouragement of private enterprise and investment to sponsor, build and rehabilitate residential housing for persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income; and (iii) the restriction of the financial return and benefit to the mortgage lenders from such loans to an amount that is necessary to induce their participation and that is not excessive as determined by prevailing market conditions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the interest rate or rates and other terms of the loans to mortgage lenders made from the proceeds of any issue of bonds of the Agency shall provide that the amounts received by the Agency in repayment of the loans and interest thereon shall be at least sufficient to assure the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds as they become due.

The Agency shall enter into a written agreement with each mortgage lender that shall require as a condition of each loan to such mortgage lender that the mortgage lender shall originate new mortgage loans within a reasonable period of time as determined by the Agency’s rules and regulations and that such new mortgage loans shall have such stated maturities as determined by the Agency’s rules and regulations.

The loans to mortgage lenders shall be general obligations of the respective mortgage lenders owing them. The Agency shall require that such loans shall be additionally secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge and lien upon collateral security. The collateral security itself shall be in such amount as the Agency determines will assure the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds as they become due. Collateral security shall be deemed to be sufficient if the principal of and the interest on the collateral security, when due, will be sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds. The collateral security shall consist of any of the following items: (i) direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the State or the United States of America; (ii) bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, satisfactory to the Agency, issued by any of the following federal agencies: Bank for Cooperatives, Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, Federal Home Loan Bank System, Export-Import Bank of Washington, Federal Land Banks, Fannie Mae or the Government National Mortgage Association; (iii) direct obligations of or obligations guaranteed by the State; (iv) mortgages insured or guaranteed by the United States of America or an instrumentality of it as to payment of principal and interest; (v) any other mortgages secured by real estate on which there is located a residential structure, the collateral value of which shall be determined by the regulations issued from time to time by the Agency; (vi) obligations of Federal Home Loan Banks; (vii) certificates of deposit of banks or trust companies, including the trustee, organized under the laws of the United States or any state, which have a combined capital and surplus of at least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000); (viii) Bankers Acceptances; and (ix) commercial paper that has been classified for rating purposes by Dun & Bradstreet, Inc., as Prime-1 or by Standard & Poor’s Corp. as A-1.

The Agency may require as a condition of any loan to a mortgage lender such representations and warranties that it determines to be necessary to secure such loans and to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

1983, c. 148, s. 3; 2001-487, s. 14(i).

§ 122A-5.7.
Homeownership Assistance Fund authorized; authority.

The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency is authorized to establish a Homeownership Assistance Fund (hereinafter referred to as “the Fund”) to assist families of low and moderate income in the purchase of affordable residential housing. To achieve this purpose, the Agency may use the Fund to provide additional security for eligible loans, to subsidize down payments, principal payments and interest payments, and to provide any type of mortgage assistance the Agency deems necessary. The Fund shall operate as a revolving fund. The Agency shall adopt rules for the operation and use of the Fund. These funds shall be used for people who otherwise would be unable to receive subsidized loans from the Housing Finance Agency.

History.

1983, c. 923, s. 203.

§ 122A-5.8.
Distressed multi-family residential rental housing provisions.

The General Assembly hereby finds and determines that a serious shortage of decent, safe and sanitary multi-family residential rental housing which persons and families of low and moderate income in the State can afford continues to exist; that it is in the best interests of the State to continue to promote and maintain the viability of such housing and to encourage private enterprise to sponsor, build and rehabilitate additional multi-family residential rental housing for such low and moderate income persons and families; that certain multi-family residential rental housing projects financed by the Agency are currently experiencing financial difficulties due to low occupancy levels; that measures to facilitate higher occupancy levels by extending occupancy on a temporary basis to those with incomes in excess of required low and moderate levels will help to maintain certain multi-family residential rental housing for persons and families of low and moderate income to prevent foreclosure and the use of such facilities without regard to income limitations; and that the Agency in providing such temporary assistance is promoting the health, welfare and property of all citizens of the State and is serving a public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

“Distressed rental housing project” means any multi-family residential rental housing project heretofore or hereafter financed by the Agency that, as determined by resolution of the Board of Directors of the Agency, has an occupancy level below that required for sustaining operation and as a result thereof needs to increase its occupancy levels in order to avoid foreclosure and the subsequent use of such facilities without regard to the Agency’s income limitations. In determining the foregoing, the Board of Directors of the Agency shall take into consideration (1) occupancy rates of the project, (2) market conditions affecting the project, (3) costs of operation of the project, (4) debt service for the project, (5) management of the project and such other factors as the Board of Directors may deem relevant.

The Board of Directors of the Agency may determine, by resolution, to permit not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the rental units in any distressed rental housing project to be rented to persons or families without regard to income until the project’s occupancy levels, in the judgment of the Agency, will sustain operations at a level sufficient to prevent delinquency or default.

The Board of Directors may also determine, by resolution, to permit additional rental units at any such distressed rental housing project, to be rented to persons or families without regard to income, subject to the restriction contained in subsection (c) of this section, provided that: (1) the units therein that have been available for rental without regard to income have been available for a period of time not less than three months, (2) the Agency has determined that permitting additional units, in excess of ten percent (10%), to be rented without regard to income is necessary in order for such distressed rental housing project to avoid foreclosure, and (3) the total number of housing units at any distressed rental housing project rented without regard to income shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the total number of units therein.

Once a distressed rental housing project attains sustaining occupancy at a level satisfactory to the Agency, the Agency will thereafter require the owners of such distressed rental housing project to rent only to persons and families of low and moderate income and will require that any units that were leased without regard to income limitations pursuant to the provisions of this section will next be leased, when such units become vacant, only to persons and families whose incomes fall within the then current Agency income limitations.

History.

1987, c. 305, s. 1; 1989, c. 454, ss. 1-3; 1989, c. 454, s. 3.

§ 122A-5.9.
Formation of subsidiary corporations to own and operate housing projects.

The Agency may acquire, by purchase or otherwise, construct, acquire, develop, own, repair, maintain, improve, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip, operate, and manage residential rental housing projects to rent to persons and families of lower and moderate income.

The Agency may form a nonprofit corporation or corporations under the laws of this State which may acquire, construct, develop, repair, improve, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip, operate and manage residential rental housing projects for persons and families of lower and moderate income. All of the stock of a nonprofit corporation formed by the Agency shall be owned by the Agency and its Board of Directors shall be elected or appointed by the Agency.

No statutory provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to the Agency or to any nonprofit corporation formed pursuant to this section.

History.

1987, c. 305, s. 2.

§§ 122A-5.10 through 122A-5.12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-115, s. 55(a), effective January 1, 2015.

History.

G.S. 112A-5.10; 1993, c. 321, s. 305(d); G.S. 112A-5.11; 1993, c. 321, s. 305(d); 1995, c. 263, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 19.1(d); G.S. 112A-5.12; 1993, c. 321, s. 305(d); repealed by 2014-115, s. 55(a), effective January 1, 2015.